Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Chapter 6. Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program.

§ 63.2-600.
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF); purpose; administration.

There is hereby created the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program, hereinafter referred to as TANF or the “Program.” The Program shall be administered by the Department in compliance with Titles IV-A and IV-F of the Social Security Act and related federal regulations (excluding 45 C.F.R. Parts 255 and 256), as such laws and regulations were in effect at the time of the enactment of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, P.L. 104-193 on August 22, 1996, to the extent that such laws and regulations do not conflict with (i) those sections of P.L. 104-193 which are mandatory; (ii) waivers granted by the Department of Health and Human Services to Virginia in effect as of January 1, 1997; (iii) state laws and regulations; (iv) the State Plan For Title IV-A of the Social Security Act: Financial Assistance Aid to Families with Dependent Children in effect as of September 30, 1996; or (v) the Title IV-F of the Social Security Act Job Opportunities and Basic Skills Training Program State Plan in effect as of September 30, 1996. Further, in any instance where a state law or regulation enacted pursuant to a waiver conflicts with the terms of P.L. 104-193 or the Title IV-A or IV-F State Plans, such state law or regulation shall control.

The General Assembly declares that it is the policy of the Commonwealth to support the efforts of public agencies and charitable and community groups seeking to assist low-income Virginians in their efforts to become self-sufficient. To this end, the Department is designated as the state agency responsible for coordinating state efforts in this regard.

History.

1997, cc. 575, 621, § 63.1-86.1; 2002, c. 747; 2011, cc. 4, 857.

Cross references.

As to exemption of certain records from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act, see §

2.2-3705.5

.

As to number of persons eligible for TANF being a factor in the distribution formula for law-enforcement expenditures, see §

9.1-165

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 350 C, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, the Department of Social Services shall maintain a separate state program, as that term is defined by federal regulations governing the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) program, 45 C.F.R. § 260.30, for the purpose of providing welfare cash assistance payments to able-bodied two-parent families. The separate state program shall be funded by state funds and operated outside of the TANF program. Able-bodied two-parent families shall not be eligible for TANF cash assistance as defined at 45 C.F.R. § 260.31 (a)(1), but shall receive benefits under the separate state program provided for in this paragraph. Although various conditions and eligibility requirements may be different under the separate state program, the basic benefit payment for which two-parent families are eligible under the separate state program shall not be less than what they would have received under TANF. The Department of Social Services shall establish regulations to govern this separate state program.”

Effective date.

This title became effective October 1, 2002.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by cc. 4 and 857 are identical, and designated the existing provisions of the section as subsection A; and added subsection B.

Law Review.

For a book review, “Rights, Costs, and the Incommensurability Problem Reviewing the Cost of Rights:
Why Liberty Depends on Taxes,” see 86 Va. L. Rev. 1303 (2000).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Poor and Poor Laws, §§ 2, 3.

§ 63.2-601.
Virginia Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program; goals.

The goals of the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program are to:

Offer Virginians living in poverty the opportunity to achieve economic independence by removing barriers and disincentives to work and providing positive incentives to work;

Provide families living in poverty with the opportunities and work skills necessary for self-sufficiency;

Allow families living in poverty to contribute materially to their own self-sufficiency;

Set out the responsibilities of and expectations for recipients of public assistance and the government; and

Provide families living in poverty with the opportunity to obtain work experience through the Virginia Initiative for Education and Work (VIEW).None of the provisions of this chapter shall be construed or interpreted to create any rights, causes of action, administrative claims or exemptions to the provisions of the Program, except as specifically provided in §§

63.2-609

,

63.2-613

, and

63.2-618

.The Department of Small Business and Supplier Diversity and the Virginia Employment Commission shall assist the Department in the administration of the Program.

History.

1994, cc. 858, 951, § 63.1-133.41; 1995, c. 450; 1996, cc. 589, 599; 2002, c. 747; 2013, c. 482; 2019, c. 210.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 482, effective January 1, 2014, substituted “Small Business and Supplier Diversity” for “Business Assistance” in the last paragraph of the section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 210 substituted “Virginia Initiative for Education and Work (VIEW)” for “Virginia Initiative for Employment Not Welfare (VIEW)” in subdivision 5.

§ 63.2-601.1.
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund, hereafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All donations and contributions to the Fund and such moneys as shall be appropriated by the General Assembly shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes set forth in this section. Moneys in the Fund shall be used to:

Supplement the assistance provided through the Department’s administration of the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant; and

Assist the Commonwealth in maximizing the amount of funds available to serve the stated purposes of the TANF program by leveraging individual, corporate, and charitable donations.

Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Commissioner. Up to 10 percent of the Fund may be used to pay the Department’s expenses in administering the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Program.

The Department shall administer the Fund in accordance with the provisions of this section.

History.

2011, cc. 4, 857.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 4 and 857 are identical except the second sentence of subsection B in Acts 2011, c. 4 begins “Up to 12 percent,” while Acts 2011, c. 857 begins “Up to 10 percent.” Subsection B is set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 63.2-601.2.
Statewide Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) Program Funding Pool Program.

The Department shall develop a Statewide TANF Program Funding Pool Program (the Funding Pool Program) and shall allocate to the Funding Pool Program that portion of the TANF block grant to be awarded to service providers for expanded TANF programs, which shall include all funds not transferred to the Social Services Block Grant or used for cash assistance, employment services, or child-care benefits through the TANF program, up to an amount equal to 12 percent of the total amount of the TANF block grant for that year.

Prior to submission of its proposed biennial budget to the Governor, the Department shall issue a Request for Proposals for use of available funds from the Funding Pool Program to service providers providing expanded TANF programs through a competitive process that is designed in a manner that ensures that all service providers in the Commonwealth, regardless of size or geographic location, are afforded the opportunity to apply for funds. All programs and services funded through the Funding Pool Program shall comply with all federal and state statutory and regulatory requirements and shall serve the stated purposes of the TANF program.

In developing the Request for Proposals, the Department shall include:

A long-range planning and priority-setting process to identify state and local service needs and avoid overlap or duplication of services. The planning and priority-setting process shall include opportunity for citizen participation and consideration of local and statewide service needs and priorities;

A competitive process, to include uniform eligibility criteria for service providers seeking funding and uniform application and selection procedures for comparable service categories;

Uniform oversight, administrative, and reporting requirements for service providers receiving funding through the Funding Pool Program; and

Uniform program evaluation criteria to determine the effectiveness and efficiency of comparable services funded through the Funding Pool Program.

The Department shall require all service providers applying for funding through the Funding Pool Program to submit a detailed proposal that includes a proposed budget, proposed program outcomes, and proposed program outcome measures. Following review of applications for funding received pursuant to this section, the Department shall provide a summary of the requests for funding and recommendations to the Governor and the General Assembly of the programs to be funded in the proposed biennial budget, the levels of funding recommended, and the rationale for such recommendations, and the Governor shall consider such recommendations in developing the proposed budget.

The Department shall require all providers receiving Funding Pool Program funds to report annually on the use of the funds and outcomes achieved and shall include such information in its annual report to the General Assembly.

History.

2011, c. 531; 2020, cc. 860, 861.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2011 act having been

63.2-601.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and deleted “Child Care and Development Block Grant or” preceding “Social Services Block Grant” in subsection A.

§ 63.2-602.
Eligibility for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF); penalty.

A person shall be eligible for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families if that person:

Has not attained the age of 18 years, or, if a full-time student in a secondary school or in the equivalent level of career and technical education, has not attained the age of nineteen years;

Is a resident of Virginia;

Is living with his father, mother, grandfather, grandmother, brother, sister, stepfather, stepmother, stepbrother, stepsister, uncle, aunt, first cousin, nephew, or niece in a residence maintained by such relative or is in placement under conditions specified by the Board;

Is in need of public assistance; and

If less than 18 years of age, is in compliance with compulsory school attendance laws (§ 22.1-254 et seq.) as described in §

63.2-606

. Prior to imposing a sanction of benefits, the local department shall make reasonable efforts to discuss with the parent or caretaker, by personal contact that may include direct telephone contact, a plan to return the child to school. If such efforts fail, the local department shall mail a written advance notice of proposed action to the parent or caretaker advising that benefits may be reduced if the parent or caretaker fails to contact the local department to develop a plan to return the child to school.

An applicant for TANF shall:

Furnish, apply for or have an application made on his behalf, and on behalf of all children for whom assistance is being requested, for a social security account number to be used in the administration of the program;

Assign the Commonwealth any rights to support from any other person such applicant may have on his own behalf or on behalf of any other family member for whom the applicant is applying for or receiving aid, except for any support that accrued prior to the execution of the assignment;

Identify the parents of the child for whom aid is claimed, subject to the “good cause” provisions or exceptions in federal law or regulations. However, this requirement shall not apply if the child is in a foster care placement or if the local department determines, based upon the sworn statement of the applicant or recipient or of another person with knowledge of the circumstances, that the child was conceived as the result of incest or rape; and

Cooperate in (i) locating the parent of the child with respect to whom TANF is claimed, (ii) establishing the paternity of a child born out of wedlock with respect to whom TANF is claimed, (iii) obtaining support payments for such applicant or recipient and for a child with respect to whom TANF is claimed, and (iv) obtaining any other payments or property due such applicant or recipient for such child.Any applicant or recipient who intentionally misidentifies another person as a parent shall be guilty of a Class 5 felony.

Unless an exception to the requirement set forth in subdivision B 3 applies, the Department’s Division of Child Support Enforcement shall proceed to determine parentage pursuant to Chapter 3.1 (§

20-49.1

et seq.) of Title 20. If paternity is not established after six months of receipt of TANF, the case shall be reviewed to determine the reason that paternity has not been established. If paternity has not been established due to the caretaker relative’s noncooperation, the local department may suspend the entire grant or the adult portion of the grant, subject to Board regulations.

TANF shall be provided to two-parent families on the same terms and conditions that TANF is provided to single-parent families.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-141; 1954, c. 495; 1966, c. 665; 1968, cc. 578, 667, 668, 781, § 63.1-105; 1970, c. 721; 1974, c. 418; 1976, c. 215, § 63.1-105.1; 1982, c. 386; 1993, c. 167; 1994, cc. 188, 934; 1995, c. 450; 1996, c, 848, 857; 1999, c. 638; 2001, c. 483; 2002, c. 747; 2010, c. 250; 2019, c. 376.

Cross references.

As to revision of schedule of TANF financial assistance for a newly born child of a family which is subject to a penalty for failure to comply with eligibility requirements, see §

63.2-604

.

For punishment for Class 5 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 250 substituted “except for any support that accrued prior to the execution of the assignment” for “and that have accrued at the time such assignment is executed” in subdivision B 2.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 376, in subdivision A 1, substituted “a full-time student in” for “regularly attending” and deleted “and is reasonably expected to complete his senior year of school prior to attaining age nineteen” from the end; in subdivision A 5, substituted “less than 18 years of age” for “under the age of eighteen years.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14A M.J. Parent and Child, § 10.

§ 63.2-603.
Eligibility for TANF; childhood immunizations.

An applicant for TANF shall provide verification that all eligible children not enrolled in school, a licensed family day home as defined in § 22.1-289.02, or a licensed child day center as defined in § 22.1-289.02, have received immunizations in accordance with §

32.1-46

. However, if an eligible child has not received immunizations in accordance with §

32.1-46

, verification shall be provided at the next scheduled redetermination of eligibility for TANF after initial eligibility is granted that the child has received at least one dose of each of the immunizations required by §

32.1-46

as appropriate for the child’s age and that the child’s physician or the local health department has developed a plan for completing the immunizations. Verification of compliance with the plan for completing the immunizations shall be presented at subsequent redeterminations of eligibility for TANF.

If necessary, the local department shall provide assistance to the TANF recipient in obtaining verification from immunization providers. No sanction may be imposed until the reason for the failure to comply with the immunization requirement has been identified and any barriers to accessing immunizations have been removed.

Failure by the recipient to provide the required verification of immunizations shall result in a reduction in the amount of monthly assistance received from the TANF program until the required verification is provided. The reduction shall be $50 for the first child and $25 for each additional child for whom verification is not provided.

Any person who becomes ineligible for TANF payments as a result of this provision shall nonetheless be considered a TANF recipient for all other purposes.

History.

1994, c. 188, § 63.1-105.2; 2002, c. 747; 2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in the first paragraph, inserted “as defined in § 22.1-289.02” twice in the first sentence; and made stylistic changes.

§ 63.2-604.
Repealed by Acts 2020, c. 550, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

63.2-604

, pertaining to eligibility for TANF for children born to TANF recipients, derived from Acts 1995, c. 450, § 63.1-105.7; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-605.
Eligibility for TANF; parolees and probationers who fail drug tests.

Upon receipt of notification from a probation or parole officer that a TANF caretaker under his supervision has failed a drug test, the local department shall provide future TANF cash benefits to such caretaker’s assistance unit as protective or vendor payments to a third party payee for the benefit of the assistance unit. After twelve months, the local department may reinstate such caretaker as the payee for the assistance unit provided such caretaker has failed no subsequent drug test within such twelve-month period. Any caretaker who is reported to have failed a drug test under this section may appeal such report, including the validity of any test results, pursuant to §§

63.2-517

,

63.2-518

and

63.2-519

.

History.

1997, c. 526, § 63.1-105.8; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-606.
Eligibility for TANF; school attendance.

In order to be eligible for TANF, members of the assistance unit, including minor custodial parents, shall be in compliance with compulsory school attendance laws (§ 22.1-254 et seq.). The Board shall adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this section, including procedures for local departments to (i) receive notification from local school divisions of students who are truant and (ii) assist families in noncompliance to achieve compliance. An applicant for or recipient of TANF or any member of his assistance unit who has been found guilty under § 22.1-263 shall not be eligible for TANF financial assistance until in compliance with compulsory school attendance laws. Any person who becomes ineligible for TANF financial assistance as a result of this section shall nonetheless be considered a TANF recipient for all other purposes.

History.

1995, c. 450, § 63.1-105.4; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

As to eligibility for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families of person under age 18 who is in compliance with compulsory school attendance laws, see §

63.2-602

.

§ 63.2-607.
Eligibility for TANF; minor parent residency.

Except as provided in subsection B, an unemancipated minor custodial parent may receive TANF for himself and his child only if the individual and his child reside in the home maintained by his parent or person standing in loco parentis. For purposes of TANF eligibility determination, a minor who receives government-provided public assistance is not considered emancipated unless married.

The provisions of subsection A shall not apply if:

The individual has no parent or person standing in loco parentis who is living or whose whereabouts are known;

The local department determines that the physical or emotional health or safety of the individual or his dependent child would be jeopardized if the individual and dependent child lived in the same residence with the individual’s parent or the person standing in loco parentis for the individual; or

The local department otherwise determines, in accordance with Board regulations, that there is good cause for waiving the requirements of subsection A.

If the individual and his dependent child are not required to live with the individual’s parent or the person standing in loco parentis for the individual, the local department shall assist the individual in locating an appropriate adult supervised supportive living arrangement taking into consideration the needs and concerns of the minor and thereafter shall require that the individual and his child reside in such living arrangement or an alternative appropriate arrangement as a condition of the continued receipt of TANF. If the local department is unable, after making diligent efforts, to locate any such appropriate living arrangement, it shall provide case management and other social services consistent with the best interests of the individual and child who live independently.

History.

1995, c. 450, § 63.1-105.6; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-607.1.
Eligibility for TANF; drug-related felonies.

A person who is otherwise eligible to receive TANF assistance shall be exempt from the application of § 115(a)(1) of the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, P.L. 104-193, and shall not be denied such assistance solely because he has been convicted of a drug-related felony.

History.

2020, cc. 221, 361.

§ 63.2-608.
Virginia Initiative for Education and Work (VIEW).

The Department shall establish and administer the Virginia Initiative for Education and Work (VIEW) to reduce long-term dependence on welfare, emphasize personal responsibility, and enhance opportunities for personal initiative and self-sufficiency by promoting the value of work. The Department shall endeavor to develop placements for VIEW participants that will enable participants to develop job skills that are likely to result in independent employment and that take into consideration the proficiency, experience, skills, and prior training of a participant.

VIEW shall recognize clearly defined responsibilities and obligations on the part of public assistance recipients and shall include a written agreement of personal responsibility requiring parents to participate in work activities while receiving TANF, earned-income disregards to reduce disincentives to work, and a limit on TANF financial assistance.

VIEW shall require all able-bodied recipients of TANF who do not meet an exemption to participate in a work activity. VIEW shall require eligible TANF recipients to participate in unsubsidized, partially subsidized or fully subsidized employment or other allowable TANF work activity as defined by federal law and enter into an agreement of personal responsibility.

To the maximum extent permitted by federal law, and notwithstanding other provisions of Virginia law, the Department and local departments may, through applicable procurement laws and regulations, engage the services of public and private organizations to operate VIEW and to provide services incident to such operation.

All VIEW participants shall be under the direction and supervision of a case manager.

The Department shall ensure that participants are assigned to one of the following work activities within 90 days after the approval of TANF assistance:

Unsubsidized private-sector employment;

Subsidized employment, as follows:

The Department shall conduct a program in accordance with this section that shall be known as the Full Employment Program (FEP). Persons who are otherwise eligible for TANF may participate in FEP unless exempted by this chapter. FEP shall assign participants to subsidized wage-paying private-sector jobs designed to increase the participants’ self-sufficiency and improve their competitive position in the workforce.

Participants in FEP shall be placed in full-time employment when appropriate and shall be paid by the employer at an hourly rate not less than the federal or state minimum wage, whichever is higher. Wages earned by a FEP employee during the period for which his employer receives a subsidy pursuant to subdivision c shall be disregarded in the calculation of TANF benefits.

Every employer subject to the Virginia unemployment insurance tax shall be eligible for assignment of FEP participants, but no employer shall be required to utilize such participants. Pursuant to Board regulations, participating employers shall receive a subsidy of up to $1,000 per month for each FEP employee for a period not to exceed six months. Employers shall ensure that jobs made available to FEP participants are in conformity with § 3304(a)(5) of the Federal Unemployment Tax Act. FEP participants cannot be used to displace regular workers.

FEP employers shall:

Endeavor to make FEP placements positive learning and training experiences;

Provide on-the-job training to the degree necessary for the participants to perform their duties;

Pay wages to participants at the same rate that they are paid to other employees performing the same type of work and having similar experience and employment tenure;

Provide sick leave, holiday and vacation benefits to participants to the same extent and on the same basis that they are provided to other employees performing the same type of work and having similar employment experience and tenure;

Maintain health, safety and working conditions at or above levels generally acceptable in the industry and no less than those in which other employees perform the same type of work;

Provide workers’ compensation coverage for participants;

Encourage volunteer mentors from among their other employees to assist participants in becoming oriented to work and the workplace; and

Sign an agreement with the local department outlining the employer requirements to participate in FEP. All agreements shall include notice of the employer’s obligation to repay FEP reimbursements in the event the employer violates FEP rules.

As a condition of FEP participation, employers shall be prohibited from discriminating against any person, including program participants, on the basis of race, color, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, religion, age, or disability;

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections A and D, if a local department determines that a VIEW participant is in need of job skills and would benefit from immediate job skills training, it may place the participant in a program preparing individuals for a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education, a career and technical education program targeted at skills required for particular employment opportunities, or an apprenticeship program developed by the local department in accordance with requirements established by the Department. Eligible participants include those with problems related to obtaining and retaining employment, such as participants (i) with less than a high school education, (ii) whose reading or math skills are at or below the eighth grade level, (iii) who have not retained a job for a period of at least six months during the prior two years, or (iv) who are in a treatment program for a substance abuse problem or are receiving services through a family violence treatment program. The VIEW participant may continue in a high school equivalency examination preparation program, career and technical education program, or apprenticeship program for as long as the local department determines he is progressing satisfactorily and to the extent permitted by the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193), as amended.

Participants may be reevaluated after a period determined by the local department and reassigned to another work component. In addition, the number of hours worked may be reduced by the local department so that a participant may complete additional training or education to further his employability.

Local departments shall be authorized to sanction parents up to the full amount of the TANF grant for noncompliance, unless good cause exists.

VIEW participants shall not be assigned to projects that require that they travel unreasonable distances from their homes or remain away from their homes overnight without their consent.

Any injury to a VIEW participant arising out of and in the course of community work experience shall be covered by the participant’s existing Medicaid coverage. If a community work experience participant is unable to work due to such an accident, his status shall be reviewed to determine whether he is eligible for an exemption from the limitation on TANF financial assistance.

A community work experience participant who becomes incapacitated for 30 days or more shall be eligible for TANF financial assistance for the duration of the incapacity, if otherwise eligible.

The Board shall adopt regulations providing for the accrual of paid sick leave or other equivalent mechanism for community work experience participants.

3.

Part-time or temporary employment;

4.

Community work experience, as follows:

a.

The Department and local departments shall work with other state, regional and local agencies and governments in developing job placements that serve a useful public purpose as provided in § 482(f) of the Social Security Act, as amended. Placements shall be selected to provide skills and serve a public function. VIEW participants shall not displace regular workers.

b.

The number of hours per week for participants shall be determined by combining the total dollar amount of TANF and SNAP benefits and dividing by the minimum wage with a maximum of a work week of 32 hours, of which up to 12 hours of employment-related education and training may substitute for work experience employment; or

5.

Any other allowable TANF work activity as defined by federal law.

History.

1994, cc. 858, 951, § 63.1-133.49; 1995, c. 450; 1996, c. 1023; 1999, c. 759; 2000, cc. 483, 491; 2001, c. 483; 2002, c. 747; 2003, cc. 428, 467; 2005, c. 472; 2007, c. 568; 2014, c. 84; 2016, c. 101; 2019, c. 210; 2020, c. 1137; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 160, 209; 2022, c. 298.

Cross references.

As to powers and duties of Virginia Board of Workforce Development and the Virginia Workforce System, see §

2.2-2472

.

Editor’s note.

The Federal Unemployment Tax Act, referred to above, is codified as 26 U.S.C.S. § 3301 et seq.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 428 substituted “30” for “thirty,” “32” for “thirty-two,” and “90” for “ninety” throughout the section; deleted former subsection F, which read: “Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections A and D, persons eligible to participate in TANF shall also be eligible to participate in approved projects established through the Economic and Employment Improvement Program for Disadvantaged Persons of Chapter 7 (§

63.2-700

et seq.) of this title”; and redesignated former subsections G through I as present subsections F through H.

The 2003 amendment by c. 467 substituted “30” for “thirty,” “32” for “thirty-two,” and “90” for “ninety” throughout the section; and in subsection E, substituted “career and technical education” for “vocational educational” in the next-to-last sentence.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 472 deleted “by accident” preceding “arising” in the first sentence of the second paragraph of subsection H.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 568 rewrote the last paragraph in subsection A and subsections D and E; and in subsection G, substituted “parents” for “participants” and “for noncompliance, unless good cause exists” for “and food stamps allotment for noncompliance.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 84, in subsection E, substituted “program preparing individuals for a high school equivalency examination approved by the Board of Education” for “general educational development (GED) program” in the first sentence, and substituted “high school equivalency examination preparation” for “GED” in the last sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 101, in subsection E, inserted “or an apprenticeship program developed by the local department in accordance with requirements established by the Department” in the first sentence, inserted “or apprenticeship program” in the last sentence and made related and stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 210 substituted “Virginia Initiative for Education and Work (VIEW)” for “Virginia Initiative for Employment Not Welfare (VIEW)” in subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1137 inserted “sexual orientation, gender identity” in subdivision D 2 e.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 160, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “SNAP benefits” for “food stamps” in subdivision D 4 b; added subsection D 5; and made related changes.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 209, effective July 1, 2021, in subdivision D 2 a, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “FEP replaces TANF with subsidized employment” and deleted “not able to find unsubsidized employment” following “Persons” in the second sentence; rewrote the last sentence in subdivision D 2 b, which formerly read: “At no point shall a participant’s spendable income received from wages and tax credits be less than the value of TANF received prior to the work placement”; and inserted the second sentence in subdivision D 2 c.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 298, deleted former subdivision D 5, which read: “Educational activities that lead to a post-secondary credential, such as a degree or industry-recognized credential, certification, or license from an accredited institution of higher education or other postsecondary school licensed or certified by the Board of Education or the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia; or”; and redesignated former subdivision D 6 as current subdivision D 5.